District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.52

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for a license as an asbestos worker shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that the applicant:

(1)

Has successfully completed a course of instruction on asbestos abatement that has been approved by the Board; or

(2)

Currently holds a valid license in asbestos abatement from the federal government; and

(3)

Has provided such additional evidence as the Board or the federal government has determined is necessary for the occupation of asbestos worker.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.52.